Utah statutes.
63G-9-401.   Appeal to Legislature.
Any person interested who is aggrieved by the disapproval of a claim by the
board may appeal from its decision to the Legislature by filing with the board
a notice thereof, and upon the receipt of such notice the board must transmit
the demand and all the papers accompanying the same, with a statement of the
evidence taken before it, to the Legislature.
